Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 14. Foreign Corporations.
§ 13.1-929.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth may not withdraw from the Commonwealth until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Commission.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth may apply to the Commission for a certificate of withdrawal. The application shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Commission and shall set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and the name of the state or other jurisdiction under whose laws it is incorporated;

If applicable, a statement that the foreign corporation was a party to a merger permitted by the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it was incorporated and that it was not the surviving entity of the merger, has consolidated with another entity, or has converted to another type of entity under the laws of the state or other jurisdiction under whose law it was incorporated;

That the foreign corporation is not transacting business in the Commonwealth and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in the Commonwealth;

That the foreign corporation revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the clerk of the Commission as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth;

A mailing address to which the clerk of the Commission may mail a copy of any process served on him under subdivision 4; and

A commitment to notify the clerk of the Commission in the future of any change in the mailing address of the corporation.

The Commission shall not allow any foreign corporation to withdraw from the Commonwealth unless such corporation files with the Commission a statement certifying that the corporation has filed returns and has paid all state taxes to the time of the certificate or a statement that no such returns are required to be filed or taxes are required to be paid. In such case the corporation may file returns and pay taxes before they would otherwise be due. If the Commission finds that the application complies with the requirements of law and that all required fees have been paid, it shall issue a certificate of withdrawal.

Before any foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth terminates its corporate existence, it shall file with the Commission an application for withdrawal. Whether or not such application is filed, the termination of the corporate existence of such foreign corporation shall not take away or impair any remedy available against such corporation for any right or claim existing or any liability incurred prior to such termination. Any such action or proceeding against such foreign corporation may be defended by such corporation in its corporate name. The members, directors and officers shall have power to take such corporate or other action as shall be appropriate to protect such remedy, right or claim. The right of a foreign corporation that has terminated its corporate existence to institute and maintain in its corporate name actions, suits or proceedings in the courts of the Commonwealth shall be governed by the law of the state of its incorporation.

Service of process on the clerk of the Commission is service of process on a foreign corporation that has withdrawn pursuant to this section. Service upon the clerk shall be made in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

, and service upon the foreign corporation may be made in any other manner permitted by law.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 13.1-278, 13.1-278.1; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 564; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1986, c. 529; 1991, c. 672; 2007, c. 925; 2012, c. 130; 2015, c. 623.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; inserted “of the Commission” following “clerk” in subdivision B 4; substituted “the clerk of the Commission in the future” for “in the future the clerk of the Commission” in subdivision B 5; added the first and next-to-last sentences in subsection C; added “the” preceding “corporate existence” in the second sentence; rewrote subsection E; and made punctuation and related changes.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130 substituted “on a form” for “on forms” in the introductory paragraph of subsection B; added subdivision B 2; redesignated former subdivisions B 2 through B 5 as subdivisions B 3 through B 6; and substituted “subdivision 4” for “subdivision 3 of this subsection” in subdivision B 5.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 substituted “other jurisdiction” for “country” in subdivision B 1 and rewrote subdivision B 2, which read “That the foreign corporation is in existence and has not been merged into or consolidated with another entity or converted into another type of entity or, if the foreign corporation has been merged into or consolidated with another entity or converted into another type of entity, that the application is signed on behalf of the foreign corporation by the surviving or resulting entity.”

§ 13.1-930.
Automatic revocation of certificate of authority.

If any foreign corporation fails to file its annual report or pay its annual registration fee in a timely manner as required by this chapter, the Commission shall mail to each such corporation notice of the impending revocation of its certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth. Whether or not such notice is mailed, if any foreign corporation fails to file its annual report or pay its annual registration fee on or before the last day of the fourth month immediately following its annual report or annual registration fee due date each year, such foreign corporation shall automatically cease to be authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and its certificate of authority shall be automatically revoked as of that day.

Every foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth shall pay the annual registration fee required by law on or before the foreign corporation’s annual registration fee due date determined in accordance with subsection A of §

13.1-936.1

of each year.

If any foreign corporation whose registered agent has filed with the Commission his statement of resignation pursuant to §

13.1-927

fails to file a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-926

within 31 days after the date on which the statement of resignation was filed, the Commission shall mail notice to the foreign corporation of impending revocation of its certificate of authority. If the foreign corporation fails to file the statement of change before the last day of the second month immediately following the month in which the impending revocation notice was mailed, the foreign corporation shall automatically cease to be authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth and its certificate of authority shall be automatically revoked as of that day.

The automatic revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority pursuant to this section constitutes the appointment of the clerk of the Commission as the foreign corporation’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. Service of process on the clerk of the Commission under this subsection is service on the foreign corporation and shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority pursuant to this section does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-279; 1956, c. 428; 1970, c. 4; 1985, cc. 522, 528; 1987, c. 2; 1988, c. 405; 1991, c. 125; 1997, c. 216; 2000, c. 52; 2007, c. 925; 2010, c. 753.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2000, c. 52, which added subsection C, in cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any domestic or foreign corporation, domestic or foreign limited liability company, or domestic or foreign limited partnership whose registered agent files a certificate of resignation with the State Corporation Commission pursuant to §§

13.1-636

,

13.1-765

,

13.1-835

,

13.1-927

,

13.1-1017

, or §

50-73.6

of the Code of Virginia on or after January 1, 2001.”

The 1997 amendment,

effective January 1, 1998, in the second sentence of subsection A, substituted “the last day of the fourth month immediately following its annual report due date each year” for “September 1 of the year it is due” and substituted “as of that day” for “as of September 1”; in subdivision B 1, substituted “the corporation’s annual report due date determined in accordance with subsection C of §

13.1-936

” for “April 1 (following the January assessment)” in the first sentence and substituted “after such date” for “after April 1” in the second sentence; and, in subdivision B 2, substituted “the due date” for “June 1” in the first sentence and substituted “the last day of the fourth month immediately following the due date” for “September 1” in the second sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 52 added subsection C.
For applicability see editor’s note.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; in subsection A, substituted “Act” for “chapter” in the first sentence and “such” for “the” preceding “foreign corporation” in the last sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 753 rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For an article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1067 (1998).

For 2000 survey of Virginia corporate and business law, see 34 U. Rich. L. Rev. 697 (2000).

§ 13.1-931.
Involuntary revocation of certificate of authority.

The certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth of any foreign corporation may be revoked by order of the Commission when it finds that the corporation:

Has continued to exceed the authority conferred upon it by law;

Has failed to maintain a registered office or a registered agent in the Commonwealth as required by law;

Has failed to file any document required by this Act to be filed with the Commission;

No longer exists under the laws of the state or country of its incorporation; or

Has been convicted for a violation of 8 U.S.C. § 1324a(f), as amended, for actions of its officers and directors constituting a pattern or practice of employing unauthorized aliens in the Commonwealth.A certificate revoked pursuant to subdivision A 5 shall not be eligible for reinstatement for a period of not less than one year.

Any foreign corporation convicted of the offense listed in subdivision A 5 shall immediately report such conviction to the Commission and file with the Commission an authenticated copy of the judgment or record of conviction.

Before entering any such order the Commission shall issue a rule against the corporation giving it an opportunity to be heard and show cause why such an order should not be entered. The Commission may issue the rule on its own motion or on motion of the Attorney General.

The authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in the Commonwealth ceases on the date shown on the order revoking its certificate of authority.

The Commission’s revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority appoints the clerk of the Commission the foreign corporation’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in the Commonwealth. Service of process on the clerk of the Commission under this subsection is service on the foreign corporation and shall be made on the clerk in accordance with §

12.1-19.1

.

Revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-280; 1956, c. 428; 1958, c. 506; 1985, c. 522; 1991, c. 672; 1995, c. 76; 2007, c. 925; 2008, cc. 588, 770; 2015, c. 623.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” throughout the section; deleted “by virtue of dissolution, termination, merger or consolidation” following “exists” in subdivision A 4; and substituted “order” for “certificate” in subsection C.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 588 and 770 are identical, and added subdivision A 5 and made related changes; added subsection B; and redesignated former subsections B through E as subsections C though F.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 substituted “reinstatement” for “reentry” in subdivision A 5.

§ 13.1-931.1.
Reinstatement of foreign corporation whose certificate of authority has been withdrawn or revoked.

A foreign corporation whose certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth has been withdrawn or revoked may be relieved of the withdrawal or revocation and have its certificate of authority reinstated by the Commission within five years after the date of withdrawal or revocation unless the certificate of authority was revoked by order of the Commission pursuant to subdivision A 1 of §

13.1-931

.

To have its certificate of authority reinstated, a foreign corporation shall provide the Commission with the following:

An application for reinstatement, which shall include the identification number issued by the Commission to the corporation, and which may be in the form of a letter signed by an officer or director of the corporation, or which may be by affidavit signed by an agent of any member’s interests stating that after diligent search by such agent, no officer or director can be found;

A reinstatement fee of $10;

All annual registration fees and penalties that were due before the certificate of withdrawal was issued or the certificate of authority was revoked and that would have been assessed or imposed to the date of reinstatement if the corporation had not withdrawn or had its certificate of authority revoked;

An annual report for the calendar year that corresponds to the calendar year of the latest annual registration fee that was assessed or that would have been assessed to the date of reinstatement;

A duly authenticated copy of any amendments or corrections made to the articles of incorporation or other constituent documents of the foreign corporation and any mergers entered into by the foreign corporation from the date of withdrawal or revocation of its certificate of authority to the date of its application for reinstatement, along with an application for an amended certificate of authority if required as a result of an amendment or a correction, and all fees required by this chapter for the filing of such instruments;

If the name of the foreign corporation does not comply with the provisions of §

13.1-924

at the time of reinstatement, an application for an amended certificate of authority to adopt a designated name for use in the Commonwealth that satisfies the requirements of §

13.1-924

, with the fee required by this chapter for the filing of an application for an amended certificate of authority; and

If the foreign corporation’s registered agent has filed a statement of resignation and a new registered agent has not been appointed, a statement of change pursuant to §

13.1-926

.

If the foreign corporation complies with the provisions of this section, the Commission shall enter an order of reinstatement, reinstating the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority to transact business in the Commonwealth.

History.

1987, c. 431; 1988, c. 405; 2004, c. 274; 2007, c. 925; 2015, c. 623.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 substituted “$10” for “ten dollars” in the second sentence; in the sixth sentence, substituted “A duly authenticated copy of any” for “Any” and inserted “and any mergers entered into by a foreign corporation”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 925 substituted “clerk” for “Clerk” in the fourth and fifth sentences.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 623 rewrote the section